Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,137
Grievance review procedures; grievance to go to director, Public Counsel, or other appropriate person.

Grievance review procedures shall allow inmates to communicate grievances directly to the Director of Correctional Services, the office of the Public Counsel, or any other appropriate person outside the Department of Correctional Services.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 83-4,117;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 62.